Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325E.251] REMITTANCE OF PAYMENT. new text end new text begin (a) If a corporation's stock is a federal covered security, as specified in United States Code, title 15, section 77r(b), the corporation must remit payment for goods and services within 45 days of receiving the goods or services. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, "corporation" includes a subsidiary that is wholly owned by a corporation subject to paragraph (a). new text end